Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.405

Applicability.

(1) The provisions of RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560 and the chapter 21, Laws of 2000 amendments to RCW 26.09.260, * 26.10.190, and 26.26B.090 apply to a court order regarding residential time or visitation with a child issued:

(a) After June 8, 2000; and

(b) Before June 8, 2000, if the existing court order does not expressly govern relocation of the child.

(2) To the extent that a provision of RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560 and the chapter 21, Laws of 2000 amendments to RCW 26.09.260, * 26.10.190, and 26.26B.090 conflicts with the express terms of a court order existing prior to June 8, 2000, then RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560 and the chapter 21, Laws of 2000 amendments to RCW 26.09.260, * 26.10.190, and 26.26B.090 do not apply to those terms of that order governing relocation of the child.

(3) The provisions of RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560 do not apply to visitation orders entered in dependency proceedings as provided in RCW 13.34.385.

[ 2019 c 46 s 5021; 2008 c 259 s 2; 2000 c 21 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 26.10 RCW, with the exception of RCW 26.10.115, was repealed by 2020 c 312 s 905. RCW 26.10.115 was repealed by 2021 c 215 s 170, effective July 1, 2022.

Intent—2000 c 21: "By this act, the legislature intends to supersede the state supreme court's decisions In Re the Marriage of Littlefield, 133 Wn.2d 39 (1997), and In Re the Marriage of Pape, Docket No. 67527-9, December 23, 1999." [ 2000 c 21 s 1.]

Captions not law—2000 c 21: "Captions used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2000 c 21 s 22.]